District of Columbia statutes.
38-231

Expulsion of students who bring weapons into public schools.

Absent extenuating circumstances, as determined on a case-by-case basis by the Superintendent of Schools, and consistent with the Individuals With Disabilities Education Act, approved October 30, 1990 (104 Stat. 1141; 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.), any student who brings a weapon into a District of Columbia Public School shall be expelled for not less than one year.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-174, § 2(a), 43 DCR 4500
This section is referenced in § 38-235.
1981 Ed., § 31-451.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 11-173 enacted §§ 31-451 through 31-454, comprising subchapter II of Chapter 4 of Title 31 (1981 Ed.).
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 11-173 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see § 2(a)-(d) of the Expulsion of Students Who Bring Weapons into Public Schools Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-289, July 1, 1996, 43 DCR 3711), § 2(a)-(d) of the Expulsion of Students Who Bring Weapons into Public Schools Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-398, October 9, 1996, 43 DCR 5692), § 2(a)-(d) of the Expulsion of Student Who Bring Weapons Into Public Schools Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-467, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 172), and § 2(a)-(d) of the Expulsion of Students Who Bring Weapons Into Public Schools Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-22, March 3, 1997, 44 DCR 1770).
For temporary (90-day) authorization for payment of attorney fees, see § 2703 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90-day) authorization for comprehensive special education transportation plans, see § 2732 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90-day) authorization for payment of attorney fees, see §§ 2(c) and 3(c) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-393, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7032).
For temporary (90 days) requirement that the Office of the State Superintendent of Education provide a suspension and expulsion report, see § 201 of the Attendance Accountability Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-133, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11531, 20 DCSTAT 1973).